Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Office of Educational
Quality and Accountability from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Seven Hundred
Eighty-five Thousand Dollars ($785,000.00) or so much thereof as may
be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability by law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be utilized as
follows:

Seven Hundred Eighty-five Thousand Dollars ($785,000.00) to
implement the provisions of Enrolled House Bill No. 4268 of the 2nd
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4044 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4044 Page 3